District of Columbia statutes.
Repealed

38-1970

Assignment to service steps — New employees; adjustment of existing employees; ilitary service; transfer from Board of Higher Education.

Repealed.

History

Aug. 5, 1955, 69 Stat. 527, ch. 569, title IV, § 7
Aug. 28, 1958, 72 Stat. 1010, Pub. L. 85-838, § 1
Oct. 24, 1962, 76 Stat. 1234, Pub. L. 87-881, title I, § 101(7)
Nov. 13, 1966, 80 Stat. 1599, Pub. L. 89-810, title II, § 202(5)
May 27, 1968, 82 Stat. 138, Pub. L. 90-319, § 2(3)
Oct. 21, 1972, 86 Stat. 1010, Pub. L. 92-518, title I, § 103(4), title II, § 203(a)
Mar. 16, 1982, D.C. Law 4-78, § 11, 29 DCR 49

Cross References

Annuities, purchase of service credit towards years of service, see § 38-2021.08.

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 31-1132.
1973 Ed., § 31-1532.